src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-laeaeqdw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - lǟʼdõ: # Verb 1 'eng /est minna/fin' - full paradigm
     lǟʼdõ+V+Inf: [lǟʼdõ, lǟdõ]
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ger: [lǟʼdsõ, lǟdsõ]
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ger: [lǟʼdsõ, lǟdsõ]
     lǟʼdõ+V+Sup: [lǟʼmõ, lǟmõ]
     lǟʼdõ+V+Sup+Ine: [lǟʼmõõs, lǟmõõs]
     lǟʼdõ+V+Sup+Ela: [lǟʼmõõst, lǟmõõst]
     lǟʼdõ+V+Sup+Tra: [lǟʼmõõks, lǟmõõks]
     lǟʼdõ+V+Sup+Abe: [lǟʼmõõt, lǟmõõt]
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [lǟʼb, lǟb]
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [lǟʼtõ, lǟtõ]
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [lǟʼbõd, lǟbõd]
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lekš
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [lekštõ, lekštā]
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [lekštõ, lekštā]
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [lǟʼ, lǟ]
     lǟʼdõ+V+Cond+Sg3: [lǟʼks, lǟks]
     lǟʼdõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: li
     lǟʼdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: li
     lǟʼdõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: ligīd
     lǟʼdõ+V+Jus+Sg3: läkkõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+QuoSg3: [lēʼji, lēji]
     lǟʼdõ+V+ActPrfPrc: [lǟʼnd, lǟnd]
